Hawaii statutes.
[§23-76] Review for 2022 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions or exclusions under the general
excise tax listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2022 and every tenth
year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and recommendations
of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than twenty days prior
to the convening of the immediately following regular session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-24.3(4)--Amounts received by employment
benefit plans and amounts received by nonprofit organizations or offices for
the administration of employee benefit plans;

(2) Section 237-24.3(5)--Amounts received from food
coupons under the federal food stamp program or vouchers under the Special
Supplemental Foods Program for Women, Infants and Children;

(3) Section 237-24.3(6)--Amounts received from the
sale of prescription drugs or prosthetic devices;

(4) Section 237-24.3(8)--Amounts received as dues by
unincorporated merchants associations for advertising or promotion;

(5) Section 237-24.3(9)--Amounts received by labor
organizations from real property leases;

(6) Section 237-24.75(2)--Reimbursements to the
Hawaii convention center operator from the Hawaii tourism authority;

(7) Section 237-24.75(3)--Reimbursements to
professional employer organizations from client companies for employee wages
and fringe benefits; and

(8) Section 209E-11--Amounts received by qualified
businesses in enterprise zones. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next